Wisconsin, session 2025, AB382.
do enact as follows:AB382,11Section 1. 253.109 of the statutes is created to read:AB382,2,32253.109 Requirements relating to a child born alive after abortion. 3(1) Definitions. In this section:AB382,2,44(a) “Abortion” has the meaning given in s. 253.10 (2) (a).AB382,2,55(b) “Born alive” means undergoes a live birth, as defined in s. 990.01 (19j).AB382,2,66(c) “Health care provider” has the meaning given in s. 146.81 (1).AB382,2,97(2) Requirements of health care providers. Any health care provider 8present at the time an abortion or attempted abortion results in a child born alive 9shall do all of the following:AB382,3,210(a) Exercise the same degree of professional skill, care, and diligence to 11preserve the life and health of the child as a reasonably diligent and conscientious 1health care provider would render to any other child born alive at the same 2gestational age.AB382,3,53(b) Observing the exercise of skill, care, and diligence required under par. (a), 4ensure that the child born alive is immediately transported and admitted to a 5hospital.AB382,3,96(3) Reporting of violations. A health care provider or an employee of a 7hospital, physician’s office, or clinic where abortions are performed or induced who 8has knowledge of a failure to comply with a requirement under sub. (2) shall 9immediately report the failure to an appropriate law enforcement agency.AB382,3,1110(4) Criminal penalty; no penalty for mother. (a) Any person who violates 11sub. (2) is guilty of a Class H felony.AB382,3,1412(b) The mother of a child born alive under circumstances described in sub. (2) 13may not be prosecuted for a violation of this section, an attempt to violate this 14section, or a conspiracy to violate this section.AB382,3,2115(5) Civil remedies; injunctions. (a) A woman upon whom an abortion was 16performed, induced, or attempted may bring a claim for damages, including 17damages for personal injury and emotional and psychological distress, against a 18person who violates or attempts to violate sub. (2). A woman who brings a claim 19under this paragraph may be awarded objectively verifiable monetary damages for 20all injuries and damages equal to 3 times the cost of the abortion or attempted 21abortion.AB382,4,222(b) A woman who has been awarded damages under par. (a) shall, in addition 1to any damages awarded under par. (a), be entitled to punitive damages for a 2violation that satisfies a standard under s. 895.043 (3).AB382,4,53(c) 1. Notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1), a woman who recovers damages under 4par. (a) or (b) may also recover reasonable attorney fees incurred in connection with 5the action.AB382,4,962. If a defendant prevails in an action under par. (a) and the court finds the 7action was frivolous or brought in bad faith, notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1), the 8defendant may recover reasonable attorney fees incurred in connection with 9defending the action.AB382,4,1010(d) A contract is not a defense to an action under this subsection.AB382,4,1211(e) Nothing in this subsection limits the common law rights of a person that 12are not in conflict with sub. (2).AB382,4,1513(f) A prosecuting attorney with appropriate jurisdiction or the department of 14justice may bring an action for injunctive relief against a person who has 15intentionally or recklessly violated this section.AB382,4,2016(6) Enforcement authority. The department of justice or the district 17attorney may investigate any allegation of or institute, manage, control, and direct, 18in the proper county, any prosecution for a violation of this section. For this 19purpose, the department of justice shall have and exercise all powers conferred 20upon district attorneys in such cases.AB382,5,1021(7) Confidentiality in court proceedings. (a) In every proceeding 22brought under this section, the court, upon motion or sua sponte, shall rule whether 23the identity of any woman upon whom an abortion was performed or induced or 1attempted to be performed or induced shall be kept confidential unless the woman 2waives confidentiality. If the court determines that a woman’s identity should be 3kept confidential, the court shall issue orders to the parties, witnesses, and counsel 4and shall direct the sealing of the record and exclusion of individuals from 5courtrooms or hearing rooms to the extent necessary to safeguard the woman’s 6identity from public disclosure. If the court issues an order to keep a woman’s 7identity confidential, the court shall provide written findings explaining why the 8woman’s identity should be kept confidential, why the order is essential to that end, 9how the order is narrowly tailored to its purpose, and why no reasonable less 10restrictive alternative exists.AB382,5,1411(b) Any person, except for a public official, who brings an action under this 12section shall do so under a pseudonym unless the person obtains the written 13consent of the woman upon whom an abortion was performed or induced, or 14attempted to be performed or induced, in violation of this section.AB382,5,1615(c) This section may not be construed to allow the identity of a plaintiff or a 16witness to be concealed from the defendant.AB382,5,1917(8) Construction. Nothing in this section may be construed as creating or 18recognizing a right to abortion or as making lawful an abortion that is otherwise 19unlawful.AB382,220Section 2. 940.01 (1) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB382,6,321940.01 (1) (c) Except as provided in sub. (2), whoever causes the death of a 22child born alive under circumstances described in s. 253.109 (2) with intent to kill 23that child is guilty of a Class A felony. The mother of a child born alive under 1circumstances described in s. 253.109 (2) may not be prosecuted for a violation of 2this paragraph, an attempt to violate this paragraph, or a conspiracy to violate this 3paragraph.AB382,6,44